src/scripts/Ukrainian/numbers.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;
define Number (%+|%-) [%0|[NZDigit Digit^<12]] (%%|%°);

define RB (%%|%°) .#. ; 

define InsertThousands 
[..] -> тисяч || Digit _ Digit^3 RB ; 

define InsertMillions 
[..] -> мільйонів || Digit _ Digit^3 тисяч ;

define InsertBillions 
[..] -> мільйярдів || Digit _ Digit^3 мільйонів;

define RemoveSkippedParts 
%0 %0 %0 [тисяч|мільйонів|мільйярдів] -> 0 ;

define Units %0:0|1:один|2:два|3:три|4:чотири|5:"п'ять"|6:шість|7:сім|8:вісім|9:"дев'ять";

define Teens 1:0 [%0:десять|1:одинадцять|2:дванадцять|3:тринадцять|4:чотирнадцять|5:"п'ятнадцять"|6:шістнадцять|7:сімнадцять|8:вісімнадцять|9:"дев'ятнадцять"];

define Tens %0:0|2:двадцять|3:тридцять|4:сорок|5:"п'ятдесят"|6:шістдесят|7:сімдесят|8:вісімдесят|9:"дев'яносто";

define Hundreds %0:0|1:сто|2:двісті|3:триста|4:чотириста|5:"п'ятсот"|6:шістсот|7:сімсот|8:вісімсот|9:"дев'ятсот";

define UpToThousand %0:нуль .P. [[(Hundreds) Teens] | [((Hundreds) Tens) Units]];

define DigitsToWords 
UpToThousand @-> ,, 
%+ @-> плюс ,, 
%- @-> мінус ,, 
%% @-> відсотків ,, 
%° @-> градусів ; 

define FixCase 
тисяч:тисяча|мільйонів:мільйон|мільйярдів:мільйярд|відсотків:відсоток|градусів:градус -> || один _ ,, 
тисяч:тисячі|мільйонів:мільйони|мільйярдів:мільйярди|відсотків:відсотки|градусів:градуси -> || два|три|чотири _ ;

define FixGender 
один -> одна || _ тисяча ,, 
два -> дві || _ тисячі ; 

regex 
Number .o. 
InsertThousands .o. 
InsertMillions .o. 
InsertBillions .o. 
RemoveSkippedParts .o. 
DigitsToWords .o. 
FixCase .o. 
FixGender;
